Massachusetts, session 194th, H492.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 3 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding after Section 75 the following section:
Section 76. Advisory commission on science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
a) There shall be an advisory commission on science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics, hereinafter referred to as the commission. The commission shall consist of thirteen
members, two of whom shall be the House and Senate chairs of the Joint Committee on
Economic Development and Emerging Technologies or their designee, two of whom shall be the
House and Senate chairs of the Joint Committee on Public Health or their designee, one of whom
of 4

shall be the House minority leader or their designee, one of whom shall be the Senate minority
leader or their designee, and seven of whom shall be appointed by the governor. Of the seven
members appointed by the governor, one shall be the President of the National Society of Black
Engineers- Boston Professionals or their designee, one shall be the President of the
Environmental League of Massachusetts or their designee, one shall be the President of Women
in the Enterprise of Science & Technology (WEST) or their designee, one shall be the President
of the Broad Institute or their designee, one shall be a public health specialist employed by a
hospital or the commonwealth from a list of not less than three nominees provided by the
Massachusetts Hospital Association, one shall be the President of MassBio or their designee, one
shall be the President of Society of Hispanic Professional Engineers- Boston Professionals or
their designee.
(b) All such appointments shall be for terms of three years from the date of appointment,
with successors appointed in a like manner. The governor may remove an appointed member of
the commission prior to the conclusion of their term if said member (i) is guilty of malfeasance
in office; (ii) substantially neglects the duties of a member of the commission; (iii) is unable to
discharge the powers and duties of their office; (iv) commits gross misconduct; or (v) is
convicted of a felony. When a vacancy occurs on the commission, a new member fulfilling the
requirements established in subsection (a) shall be appointed to fill the remainder of the
unexpired term.
(c) The commission shall annually elect from among its members a chair and any other
officers it may deem necessary. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation.
of 4

(d) The commission shall include persons of color and women, at least in such proportion
as these groups exist in the commonwealth’s population as periodically determined by the state
secretary as the commonwealth’s chief census officer. The members of the commission shall
represent a variety of subfields contained within the fields of science, technology, engineering,
and mathematics.
(e) The commission shall meet monthly and at other times as it shall deem necessary or
upon the written request of three members of the commission or the chair; provided, however,
that notice of all meetings shall be given to each commissioner and to other persons who request
such notice. The commission shall adopt regulations establishing procedures, which may include
electronic communications, by which a request to receive notice shall be made and the method
by which timely notice may be given.
(f) The commission shall be a resource to the commonwealth on issues related to science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics. The commission shall consider any matter germane
to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics, and shall file its recommendations, if any,
from time to time, with the clerks of the Senate and the House of Representatives together with
proposals for legislation, if any, necessary to carry its recommendations into effect.
(g) The commission shall have the following responsibilities:
(i) to review and analyze proposed legislation and regulatory changes and to report to the
governor, his executive secretaries, and to the general court on the commission’s evaluation of
the scientific integrity – defined herein as insulation from bias, political interference, and
inadequate procedural security, and the adherence to objective, clear, and reproducible practices
of 4

when conducting, reporting, and applying the results of scientific activities – of said legislation
and regulations;
(ii) to offer feedback, modifications, and suggestions to the general court on proposed
legislation in order to enhance the efficacy of the bills brought the floor of the legislature;
(iii) to act as an independent advocate for the interests of the commonwealth’s scientists,
technology specialists, engineers, and mathematicians in their relations with state and federal
governments;
(iv) to meet with the governor at such other times as the governor deems necessary;
(v) to meet with legislative leadership at such times as legislative leadership deems
necessary;
(vi) to promulgate rules and regulations governing its procedures; and
(vii) to perform such other like services as the commission shall decide upon.
(h) The commission may request information and assistance from state agencies as the
commission requires.
of 4